Utah statutes.
17-23-16.   Resurveys.
In the resurvey of lands surveyed under the authority of the United States,
the county surveyor or his designee shall observe the following rules:
(1)  Section and quarter-section corners, and all other corners established by
the government survey, shall stand as the true corner.
(2)  Missing corners shall be reestablished at the point where existing
evidence would indicate the original corner was located by the government
survey.
(3)  In all cases, missing corners must be reestablished with reference to the
United States Manual of Surveying Instructions.
